Hawaii, session 2025, HB344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the adoption of electric vehicles in the State continues to grow at increasing rates, with electric vehicles accounting for fifteen per cent of all new car sales in 2024, up 11.5 per cent from the year prior.  There is a need for charging infrastructure to support this growth and ensure that there is an equitable transition to clean transportation. The legislature further finds that providing electric vehicle charging options at workplaces is beneficial for several reasons.  Workplace charging provides options for people who may not be able to charge at home--typically renters, those who live in apartments, and low- and moderate-income families--the opportunity to participate in the savings and other benefits of owning an electric vehicle.  Workplace charging also encourages daytime charging, which benefits the grid by shifting energy use from peak evening hours to daytime hours, when energy is cheaper and cleaner. Therefore, the legislature finds that there is a need for more workplace charging and that the State should expand workplace charging availability in state facilities. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the design of all new state building construction where parking is to be included to provide that a number of the parking stalls, as determined by the department of accounting and general services, shall be electric vehicle charger‑ready; (2)  Require the Hawaii state energy office to conduct a survey and identify certain high-priority state facilities that include parking, including state-owned parking lots that serve a state facility, regardless of whether they are attached to the facility, to be retrofitted to include electric vehicle charging infrastructure; (3)  Establish a goal of the State to retrofit state facilities to be electric vehicle charger-ready; and (4)  Appropriate funds to the Hawaii state energy office to assess the costs of, and install, retrofits and electric vehicle charging systems at high-priority state facilities. SECTION 2.  Section 107-27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  Beginning July 1, 2023, where feasible and cost‑effective, the design of all new state building construction shall: (1)  Maximize energy and water efficiency measures; (2)  Maximize energy generation potential; and (3)  Use building materials that reduce the carbon footprint of the project. Beginning July 1, 2026, the design of all new state building construction where parking is to be included shall provide that a number of the parking stalls, as determined by the department of accounting and general services, shall be electric vehicle charger-ready. For the purposes of this subsection, "electric vehicle charger-ready" means having sufficient wiring conduits, raceways, and termination points to support a minimum of 40‑ampere, 208 or 240-volt branch circuits, and electrical panel capacity suitable to provide level 2 charging consistent with an alternating current level 2 charging station, as defined in section 269-72." SECTION 3.  (a) The Hawaii state energy office, in consultation with the department of accounting and general services and department of transportation, shall survey existing state facilities statewide that include parking, including but not limited to state-owned parking lots that serve a state facility, regardless of whether the lots are physically attached to a building, and prioritize retrofitting these state facilities in accordance with readily available information, including location, expected future demand for charging, estimated costs for retrofits of parking stalls, other make‑ready work, other planned improvements that would allow for electric vehicle charger-ready retrofit work to be performed at the same time, retrofitting for level 1 or level 3 charging at high-priority sites where appropriate, and other factors that the Hawaii state energy office deems relevant. (b) The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026.  The report shall include the results of the survey conducted pursuant to subsection (a), identifying between four to ten high-priority state facilities to be retrofitted to include electric vehicle charging infrastructure. SECTION 4.  It shall be the goal of the State to retrofit state facilities to be electric vehicle charger-ready. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to conduct detailed cost assessments to determine the cost to install, or contract for the installation of, retrofits and electric vehicle charging systems at the high-priority state facilities identified pursuant to section 3 of this Act and to perform, or contract for, these installations. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.